Maine, session 132, LD1825.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 4 MRSA §1804, sub-§3, ¶P, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 394, Pt. A, §3, is
amended to read:
P. Develop and maintain a registry of names, telephone numbers, e-mail addresses and
other contact information for attorneys who provide legal public defense services to
persons who are incarcerated. The commission shall on a weekly basis provide these
names, telephone numbers, e-mail addresses and other contact information to all
sheriffs' offices and to the Department of Corrections. On the Monday following
transmission of the information, the sheriffs' offices and the Department of Corrections
have constructive notice that communications to and from these attorneys by residents
of jails and correctional facilities are subject to the attorney-client privilege and may
not be intercepted. The attorneys' names, telephone numbers, e-mail addresses and
other contact information are confidential.
Sec. 2. 15 MRSA §714, as amended by PL 2023, c. 558, §13 and corrected by RR
2023, c. 2, Pt. A, §23, is repealed.
Sec. 3. 15 MRSA §714-A is enacted to read:
§714-A. Attorney-client communications of jail and correctional facility residents
1. Interception prohibited. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, an
oral communication or wire communication may not be intercepted if:
A. The sender or the recipient of the communication is, at the time the communication
is made, a resident in either a jail or an adult or juvenile correctional facility
administered by the Department of Corrections;
B. The other party to the communication is an attorney or an employee of the law office
of an attorney and the jail or correctional facility has actual or constructive notice at
the time the communication is made of the attorney's name; and
C. If the communication involves the use of a telephone number, the jail, correctional
facility or 3rd-party contractor of the jail or correctional facility has actual or
constructive notice at the time the communication is made of the attorney's telephone
number and the communication is made directly to or from that telephone number.
2. Fee prohibited. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, if a
communication may not be intercepted pursuant to subsection 1, a jail, correctional facility
or 3rd-party contractor of the jail or correctional facility may not charge the sender or
recipient of the communication a fee for the communication.
3. Constructive notice. For purposes of this section, the inclusion of an attorney's
name or telephone number on a list transmitted to a sheriff's office and to the Department
of Corrections by the Maine Commission on Public Defense Services pursuant to Title 4,
section 1804, subsection 3, paragraph P constitutes constructive notice of the attorney's
name or telephone number beginning on the Monday following the transmission of the
attorney's name or telephone number to:
A. Each correctional facility administered by the Department of Corrections and any
jail in the same county as a sheriff's office to which the list was transmitted; and
Page 1 - 132LR2474(01)

B. Any 3rd party with which a facility or jail described in paragraph A contracts to
provide communication services for residents.
4. Procedure. Upon receipt of a list transmitted by the Maine Commission on Public
Defense Services pursuant to Title 4, section 1804, subsection 3, paragraph P, each sheriff's
office and the Department of Corrections shall send an electronic communication to each
attorney on the list at the e-mail address included in the list. At a minimum, the
communication must:
A. Confirm that the attorney's name, telephone number and other contact information
was included on the list transmitted by the Maine Commission on Public Defense
Services;
B. If the sender is a sheriff's office, for each jail within the same county as the sheriff's
office:
(1) Certify that telephone communications between the listed telephone number
for the attorney and the jail will not be intercepted and no fee will be charged for
the telephone call; and
(2) Provide the name, e-mail address and telephone number of the person at the jail
who is responsible for ensuring that the telephone calls are not intercepted and no
fee is charged as provided in subparagraph (1); and
C. If the sender is the Department of Corrections, for each correctional facility:
(1) Certify that telephone communications between the listed telephone number
for the attorney and the correctional facility will not be intercepted and no fee will
be charged for the telephone call; and
(2) Provide the name, e-mail address and telephone number of the person at the
correctional facility who is responsible for ensuring that the telephone calls are not
intercepted and no fee is charged as provided in subparagraph (1).
Failure of the Department of Corrections or a sheriff's office to send the communication
required by this subsection may not be considered notice to an attorney that the attorney's
name and telephone number were not included on the list transmitted by the Maine
Commission on Public Defense Services pursuant to Title 4, section 1804, subsection 3,
paragraph P or that oral communications or wire communications between that attorney
and residents of a jail or a correctional facility may be intercepted or subject to a fee.
5. Monetary penalties. In addition to any other relief that may be available under
subsection 6 or any other law, the following penalties apply to violations of this section.
A. A jail, correctional facility or 3rd-party contractor providing communication
services to a jail or correctional facility that, upon receiving constructive notice of an
attorney's name and telephone number as provided in subsection 3, fails to designate
the attorney's name and telephone number as ineligible for interception commits a civil
violation for which a fine of $5,000 must be adjudged, regardless of whether any oral
communication or wire communication is intercepted in violation of subsection 1.
B. A jail, correctional facility or 3rd-party contractor providing communication
services to a jail or correctional facility that intercepts a communication in violation of
subsection 1 commits a civil violation for which a fine of $5,000 must be adjudged.
Page 2 - 132LR2474(01)

C. A jail, correctional facility or 3rd-party contractor providing communication
services to a jail or correctional facility that charges a fee for a telephone call in
violation of subsection 2 commits a civil violation for which a fine of $500 must be
adjudged.
D. If a sheriff's office or the Department of Corrections violates subsection 4, the sheriff
or the Commissioner of Corrections commits a civil violation for which a fine of $250
must be adjudged.
6. Additional consequences of unlawful interception. If an oral communication or
wire communication is intercepted in violation of subsection 1:
A. The contents of the intercepted communication and the fact and circumstances of
the intercepted communication are not admissible in a criminal proceeding, including
a proceeding under chapter 305-A;
B. A person who viewed or listened to the intercepted communication and did not
immediately discontinue viewing or listening to the intercepted communication as soon
as the person had sufficient information to determine that the sender or the recipient of
the communication was, at the time the communication was made, a resident in a jail
or correctional facility and the other party was an attorney, is disqualified from
participating in an investigation of the resident and from appearing as a witness in a
criminal proceeding in which the resident is a defendant, including a proceeding under
chapter 305‑A; and
C. A person who viewed or listened to the intercepted communication and saw or heard
information that may be relevant to a pending or anticipated charge against the resident
or a defense the resident may assert, or may lead to the discovery of that evidence, is
disqualified from participating in the investigation of the resident and from appearing
as a witness in the pending or anticipated criminal proceeding in which the resident is
a defendant, including a subsequent proceeding under chapter 305‑A on the pending or
anticipated charge.
7. Application of other law or rule. This section does not limit the applicability of
any other provision of law or of the Maine Rules of Evidence regarding the admissibility
or inadmissibility in evidence of attorney-client communications.
Sec. 4. 30-A MRSA §1566, sub-§3 is enacted to read:
3. Calls protected by attorney-client privilege. Neither a jail nor a service provider
may charge a fee for a telephone call by or to a resident that is protected by the attorney-
client privilege.
Sec. 5. 34-A MRSA §3015, sub-§2, ¶B, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 615, Pt. A, §1,
is amended to read:
B. The department shall provide a resident with a reasonable opportunity to make
telephone calls protected by the attorney-client privilege. The department shall provide
to a resident who has less than $10 in the resident's facility account a free telephone
call allowance for 30 minutes of telephone calls per week may not charge the resident
or the resident's attorney a fee for calls protected by the attorney-client privilege under
this paragraph.
Page 3 - 132LR2474(01)